test/src/older-gt-norm-yamls/N-I-D-miskîsik-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - miskîsik - ok : # -m inanimate dependent noun, hair    AEW V-initial NDI2
     miskîsik+N+A+Sg: miskîsik
     miskîsik+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg: niskîsik
     miskîsik+N+A+Px2Sg+Sg: kiskîsik
     miskîsik+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg: niskîsikonân
     miskîsik+N+A+Px12Pl+Sg: kiskîsikonaw
     miskîsik+N+A+Px2Pl+Sg: kiskîsikowâw

     miskîsik+N+A+Pl: miskîsikwa
     miskîsik+N+A+Px1Sg+Pl: niskîsikwa
     miskîsik+N+A+Px2Sg+Pl: kiskîsikwa
     miskîsik+N+A+Px1Pl+Pl: niskîsikonâna
     miskîsik+N+A+Px12Pl+Pl: kiskîsikonawa
     miskîsik+N+A+Px2Pl+Pl: kiskîsikowâwa

     miskîsik+N+A+Px3Sg+Obv: oskîsik
     miskîsik+N+A+Px3Pl+Obv: oskîsikowâwa
     miskîsik+N+A+Px4Sg+Obv: oskîsikoyiwa
     miskîsik+N+A+Px4Pl+Obv: oskîsikoyiwa

     miskîsik+N+A+Loc: miskîsikohk
     miskîsik+N+A+Px1Sg+Loc: niskîsikohk
     miskîsik+N+A+Px2Sg+Loc: kiskîsikohk
     miskîsik+N+A+Px1Pl+Loc: niskîsikonâhk
     miskîsik+N+A+Px12Pl+Loc: kiskîsikonâhk
     miskîsik+N+A+Px2Pl+Loc: kiskîsikowâhk
     miskîsik+N+A+Px3Sg+Loc: oskîsikohk
     miskîsik+N+A+Px3Pl+Loc: oskîsikowâhk
     miskîsik+N+A+Px4Sg+Loc: oskîsikoyihk
     miskîsik+N+A+Px4Pl+Loc: oskîsikoyihk

     miskîsik+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Sg: miskîsikos
     miskîsik+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Sg: [miskîsikos, miskîsikosis]
     miskîsik+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg: [niskîsikos, niskîsikosis]
     miskîsik+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px2Sg+Sg: [kiskîsikos, kiskîsikosis]
     miskîsik+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg: [niskîsikosinân, niskîsikosisinân]
     miskîsik+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px12Pl+Sg: [kiskîsikosinaw, kiskîsikosisinaw]
     miskîsik+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px2Pl+Sg: [kiskîsikosiwâw, kiskîsikosisiwâw]

     miskîsik+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Pl: [miskîsikosa, miskîsikosisa]
     miskîsik+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Sg+Pl: [niskîsikosa, niskîsikosisa]
     miskîsik+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px2Sg+Pl: [kiskîsikosa, kiskîsikosisa]
     miskîsik+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Pl+Pl: [niskîsikosinâna, niskîsikosisinâna]
     miskîsik+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px12Pl+Pl: [kiskîsikosinawa, kiskîsikosisinawa]
     miskîsik+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px2Pl+Pl: [kiskîsikosiwâwa, kiskîsikosisiwâwa]
